Mississippi, session 2026, HB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-523, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-523.  (1)  All proceedings at the counting center shall be under the direction of the election commissioners or officials in charge of the election, and shall be conducted under the observations of the public, but no persons except those authorized for the purpose shall touch any ballot.  All persons who are engaged in processing and counting of the ballots shall take the oath provided in Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890. (2)  The election commissioners or the officials in charge of the election shall appoint qualified electors who have received the training required by subsection (11) of this section to serve as members of the "resolution board."  An odd number of not less than three (3) members shall be appointed to the resolution board.  The members of the board shall take the oath provided in Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.  For general and special elections, all ballots that have been rejected by the OMR equipment and that are damaged or defective, blank or overvoted will be reviewed by the board.  For primary elections, all ballots that have been rejected by the OMR equipment and that are damaged or defective, blank or overvoted will be reviewed by the county or municipal executive committee, as applicable. Election commissioners, candidates who are on the ballot and the spouse, parents, siblings or children of such a candidate shall not be appointed to the resolution board.  In general and special elections, members of the party executive committees shall not be appointed to the resolution board unless members of all of the party executive committees who have a candidate on the ballot are appointed to the resolution board. (3)  (a)  If any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot be properly counted by the OMR equipment, the ballot will be deposited in an envelope provided for that purpose marked "RESOLUTION BOARD * * *." or "EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE," as applicable.  All such ballots shall be carefully handled so as to avoid altering, removing or adding any mark on the ballot. (b)  The election commissioners or the officials in charge of the election shall have the members of the resolution board, for a general or special election, or the members of the county or municipal executive committee, for a primary election, ascertain the intent of the voter, if possible, and, if so, manually count any damaged or defective ballots. (c)  The resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall prepare a duplicate to the damaged or defective ballot in the following manner: (i)  The resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall prepare a duplicate to the original damaged or defective ballot marked identically to the original. (ii)  The resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall mark the first original they examine as "Original #1" and the duplicate of this original as "Duplicate #1."  Later originals and duplicates shall be likewise marked and numbered consecutively so the duplicate of each original can be identified.  Duplicate ballots shall be stamped in a different manner from the original ballots so that they may be easily distinguished from the originals. (iii)  The duplicate ballots prepared pursuant to this paragraph shall be counted by the OMR equipment. (4)  The resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall examine ballots that have been rejected by the OMR equipment for appearing to be "blank" to verify if they are blank or were marked with a "nondetectable" marking device.  If it is determined that the ballot was marked with a nondetectable device, the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall prepare a duplicate to the original blank ballot in the same manner and in accordance with the same process provided in subsection (3)(c). (5)  All ballots that are rejected by the OMR equipment and that contain overvotes shall be inspected by the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate. Regarding those rejected ballots upon which an overvote appears, if the voter intent cannot be determined by the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, the officials in charge of the election may use the OMR equipment in determining the vote in the races that are unaffected by the overvote.  All other ballots that are overvoted shall be counted manually following the provisions of this section at the direction of the officials in charge of the election.  The return printed by the OMR equipment to which have been added the manually tallied ballots, which shall be duly certified by the officials in charge of the election, shall constitute the official return of each voting precinct.  Unofficial and incomplete returns may be released during the count.  Upon the completion of the counting, the official returns shall be open to the public. (6)  When the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, reviews any OMR ballot in which the voter has failed to fill in the arrow, oval, circle or square for a candidate or a ballot measure, the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall, if the intent of the voter can be ascertained, count the vote if: (a)  The voter marks the ballot with a "cross" (X) or "checkmark" (√) and the lines that form the mark intersect within or on the line of the arrow, oval, circle or square by the ballot measure or the name of the candidate. (b)  The voter blackens the arrow, oval, circle or square adjacent to the ballot measure or the name of the candidate in pencil or ink and the blackened portion extends beyond the boundaries of the arrow, oval, circle or square. (c)  The voter marks the ballot with a "cross" (X) or "checkmark" (√) and the lines that form the mark intersect adjacent to the ballot measure or the name of the candidate. (d)  The voter underlines the ballot measure or the name of a candidate. (e)  The voter draws a line from the arrow, oval, circle or square to a ballot measure or the name of a candidate. (f)  The voter draws a circle or oval around the ballot measure or the name of the candidate. (g)  The voter draws a circle or oval around the arrow, oval, circle or square adjacent to the ballot measure or the name of the candidate. (7)  The resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, when inspecting an OMR ballot that contains or appears to contain one or more overvotes, appears to be damaged or defective, or is rejected by the OMR equipment for any reason or cannot be counted by the OMR equipment, shall make its determination in accordance with the following: (a)  When an elector casts more votes for any office or measure than he or she is entitled to cast at an election, all the elector's votes for that office or measure are invalid and the elector is deemed to have voted for none of them.  If an elector casts less votes for any office or measure than he or she is entitled to cast at an election, all votes cast by the elector shall be counted but no vote shall be counted more than once. (b)  If an elector casts more than one (1) vote for the same candidate for the same office, the first vote is valid and the remaining votes for that candidate are invalid. (c)  No write-in vote for a candidate whose name is printed on the ballot shall be regarded as invalid due to misspelling a candidate's name, or by abbreviation, addition or omission or use of a wrong initial in the name, as long as the intent of the voter can be ascertained. (d)  In any case where a voter writes in the name of a candidate for President of the United States whose name is printed on the general election ballot, the failure by the voter to write in the name of a candidate for the Office of Vice President of the United States on the general election ballot does not invalidate the elector's vote for the slate of electors for any candidate whose name is written in for the Office of President of the United States. (e)  For any ballot measure in which the words "for" or "against" are printed on a ballot, if the voter shall write the word "for" or the word "against" instead of or in addition to marking the ballot in accordance with the ballot instruction in the space adjacent to the preprinted words "for" or "against," the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall, in reviewing such ballot, count the vote in accordance with the voter's handwritten preference, unless the voter marks the ballot in the space adjacent to the preprinted words "for" or "against" contrary to the handwritten preference, in which case no vote shall be recorded for such ballot in regard to the ballot measure. (f)  For any ballot measure in which the words "yes" or "no" are printed on a ballot, if the voter shall write the word "yes" or the word "no" instead of or in addition to marking the ballot in accordance with the ballot instructions in the space adjacent to the preprinted words "yes" or "no," the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall, in reviewing such ballot, count the vote in accordance with the voter's handwritten preference, unless the voter marks the ballot in the space adjacent to the preprinted words "yes" or "no" contrary to the handwritten preference, in which case no vote shall be recorded for such ballot in regard to the ballot measure. (8)  OMR equipment shall be programmed, calibrated, adjusted and set up to reject ballots that appear to be damaged or defective.  Any switch, lever or feature on OMR equipment that enables or permits the OMR equipment to override the rejection of damaged or defective ballots so that such ballots will not be reviewed by the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall not be used. (9)  Ballots shall be manually counted by the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, only when the ballots are: (a)  Properly before the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, due to being rejected by the OMR equipment because the ballots appear to be damaged or defective or are rejected by the OMR equipment for any other reason; or (b)  Properly before the resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, due to a malfunction in the OMR equipment. (10)  The resolution board or the executive committee, as appropriate, shall make and keep a record regarding the handling and counting of all ballots inspected under this section. (11)  The executive committee of each county or municipality, in the case of a primary election, or the election commissioners of each county or municipality, in the case of all other elections, in conjunction with the circuit or municipal clerk respectively, shall sponsor and conduct, a training session for up to two (2) hours, not less than five (5) days before each election, to instruct those qualified electors who are appointed to serve as members of the resolution board as to their specific duties in the election.  No member appointed to serve on the resolution board shall serve in any election unless he or she has received such instruction once during the twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date upon which the election is held. Online training courses developed by the Secretary of State, though not sponsored or conducted by the executive committee or the election commissioners, may be used to meet the requirements of this subsection (11). SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-639, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-639.  (1)  The examination and counting of all absentee ballots shall be conducted as follows: (a)  At the opening of the regular balloting and at the opening of the polls for general and special elections, the resolution board established under Section 23-15-523 and trained in the process of canvassing absentee ballots shall first take the envelopes containing the absentee ballots of such electors from the secure location at the registrar's office, and the name, address and precinct inscribed on each envelope shall be announced by the resolution board.  In primary elections, the county or municipal executive committee, as appropriate, shall first take the envelopes containing the absentee ballots of such electors from the secure location at the circuit or municipal clerk's office, as appropriate, and the name, address and precinct inscribed on each envelope shall be announced by the county or municipal executive committee, as appropriate. (b)  (i)  For absentee ballots that were received by mail, the signature on the application shall then be compared with the signature in the box on the back of the envelope.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  If it corresponds and the affidavit, if one is required, is sufficient and the resolution board or executive committee, as appropriate, finds that the applicant is a registered and qualified voter or otherwise qualified to vote, the envelope shall then be opened and the ballot removed from the envelope, without its being unfolded, or permitted to be unfolded or examined. (ii)  For absentee ballots that were cast in person in the registrar's office, the resolution board or executive committee, as appropriate, shall confirm that the voter completed the application on the front of the envelope and signed the elector's certificate in the box on the back of the envelope.  If it is signed and the resolution board or executive committee, as appropriate, finds that the applicant is a registered and qualified voter or otherwise qualified to vote, the envelope shall be opened and the absentee ballot removed from the envelope, without its being unfolded, or permitted to be unfolded or examined. (c)  Having observed and found the ballot to be regular as far as can be observed from its official endorsement, the resolution board or executive committee, as appropriate, shall deposit it in the ballot box with the other ballots before counting any ballots and enter the voter's name in the receipt book provided for that purpose.  All absentee ballots received prior to 7:00 p.m. the day before the election shall be counted in the registrar's office by the resolution board or executive committee, as appropriate, when the polls close and then added to the votes cast in each precinct.  All absentee ballots received after 7:00 p.m. the day before the election but not later than the fifth business day after the election shall be processed by the resolution board or executive committee, as appropriate. (2)  The resolution board or executive committee, as appropriate, shall also take such action as may be prescribed by the Secretary of State to ensure compliance with the identification requirements of Section 23-15-563. (3)  The resolution board or executive committee, as appropriate, shall process the absentee ballots using the procedure provided in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-573, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-573.  (1)  If any person declares that he or she is a registered voter in the jurisdiction in which he or she offers to vote and that he or she is eligible to vote in the election, but his or her name does not appear upon the pollbooks, or that he or she is not able to cast a regular election day ballot under a provision of state or federal law but is otherwise qualified to vote, or that he or she has been illegally denied registration, or that he or she is unable to present an acceptable form of photo identification: (a)  A poll manager shall notify the person that he or she may cast an affidavit ballot at the election. (b)  The person shall be permitted to cast an affidavit ballot at the polling place upon execution of a written affidavit before one (1) of the poll managers stating that the individual: (i)  Believes he or she is a registered voter in the jurisdiction in which he or she desires to vote and is eligible to vote in the election; or (ii)  Is not able to cast a regular election day ballot under a provision of state or federal law but is otherwise qualified to vote; or (iii)  Believes that he or she has been illegally denied registration; or (iv)  Is unable to present an acceptable form of photo identification. (c)  The poll manager shall allow the individual to mark a paper ballot properly endorsed by the initialing poll manager or alternate initialing poll manager in accordance with Section 23-15-541, which shall be delivered by him or her to the proper election official who shall enclose it in an affidavit ballot envelope, with the written and signed affidavit of the voter affixed to the envelope, seal the envelope and mark plainly upon it the name of the person offering to vote. (2)  The affidavit ballot envelope shall include: (a)  The complete name of the voter; (b)  A present and previous physical and mailing address of the voter; (c)  Telephone numbers where the voter may be contacted; (d)  A statement that the affiant believes he or she is registered to vote in the jurisdiction in which he or she offers to vote; (e)  The signature of the affiant; and (f)  The signature of the poll manager at the polling place at which the affiant offers to vote. (3)  (a)  A separate receipt book shall be maintained for affidavit voters and the affidavit voters shall sign the receipt book upon completing the affidavit ballot. (b)  If the affidavit voter is casting an affidavit ballot because the voter is unable to present an acceptable form of photo identification and the voter's name appears in the pollbook, then the poll manager shall write "NO ID" across from the voter's name and in the appropriate column in the pollbook. (c)  In canvassing the returns of the election, the executive committee in primary elections, or the election commissioners in other elections, shall examine the records and allow the ballot to be counted, or not counted as it appears legal. (d)  An affidavit ballot of a voter who was unable to present an acceptable form of photo identification shall not be rejected for this reason if the voter does either of the following: (i)  Returns to the circuit clerk's office, or to the municipal clerk's office for municipal elections, within five (5) business days after the date of the election and presents an acceptable form of photo identification; (ii)  Returns to the circuit clerk's office within five (5) business days after the date of the election to obtain the Mississippi Voter Identification Card, or in municipal election, returns to the municipal clerk's office within five (5) business days after the date of the election to present his or her Mississippi Voter Identification Card or Temporary Mississippi Voter Identification Card; or (iii)  Returns to the circuit clerk's office, or to the municipal clerk's office for municipal elections, within five (5) business days after the date of the election to execute a separate Affidavit of Religious Objection. (4)  When a person is offered the opportunity to vote by affidavit ballot, he or she shall be provided with written information that informs the person how to ascertain whether his or her affidavit ballot was counted and, if the vote was not counted, the reasons the vote was not counted. (5)  The officials in charge of the election shall process all affidavit ballots by using the Statewide Elections Management System.  The officials in charge of the election shall account for all affidavit ballots cast in each election, categorizing the affidavit ballots cast by reason and recording the total number of affidavit ballots counted and not counted in each such category in the Statewide Elections Management System. (6)  The Secretary of State shall, by rule duly adopted, establish a uniform affidavit ballot envelope that shall be used in all elections in this state.  The Secretary of State shall print and distribute a sufficient number of affidavit ballot envelopes to the registrar of each county for use in elections.  The registrar shall distribute the affidavit ballot envelopes to municipal and county executive committees for use in primary elections and to municipal and county election commissioners for use in all other elections. (7)  County registrars and municipal registrars shall  maintain a secure free access system that complies with the Help America Vote Act of 2002, by which persons who vote by affidavit ballot may determine if their ballots were counted, and if not, the reasons the ballot was not counted. (8)  Any person who votes in any election as a result of a federal or state court order or other order extending the time established by law for closing the polls on an election day, may only vote by affidavit ballot.  Any affidavit ballot cast under this subsection shall be separated and kept apart from other affidavit ballots cast by voters not affected by the order. SECTION 4.  Section 23-15-597, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-597.  (1)  The county executive committee shall meet  no later than one (1) week from the day following each primary election to receive and canvass the returns that must be made within the time fixed by law for returns of general elections and declare the result, and announce the name of the nominees for county and county district offices and the names of those candidates to be submitted to the second primary.  The vote for state, state district offices and legislative offices shall be tabulated by precincts and certified to and returned to the State Executive Committee, such returns to be mailed by registered letter or any safe mode of transmission within thirty-six (36) hours after the returns are canvassed and the result ascertained.  The State Executive Committee shall meet one (1) week from the day following the first primary election held for state, state district offices and legislative offices, and shall proceed to canvass the returns and to declare the result, and announce the names of those nominated for the different offices in the first primary and the names of those candidates whose names are to be submitted to the second primary election.  The State Executive Committee shall also meet one (1) week from the day on which the second primary election was held and receive and canvass the returns for state and district offices, if any, and legislative offices, if any, voted on in the second primary.  An exact and full duplicate of all tabulations by precincts as certified under this section shall be filed with the circuit clerk of the county who shall safely preserve the same in his or her office. (2)  (a)  If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the county executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the circuit clerk or the county election commission authorizing the circuit clerk or the county election commission to perform any of the duties required of the county executive committee pursuant to this section.  Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the county executive committee and the circuit clerk or the chair of the county election commission, as appropriate.  The county executive committee shall notify the State Executive Committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of the agreement. (b)  If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the municipal executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission authorizing the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission to perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to this section.  Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the municipal executive committee and the municipal clerk or the chair of the municipal election commission, as appropriate.  The municipal executive committee shall notify the State Executive Committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of the agreement. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.